Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 12
CLEAN TRANSIT

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-1201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Retail deliveries are increasing and are expected to continue to increase in communities across the state;

The motor vehicles used to make retail deliveries are some of the most polluting vehicles on the road, which has resulted in additional and increasing air and greenhouse gas pollution;

The adverse environmental and health impacts of increased emissions from motor vehicles used to make retail deliveries can be mitigated and offset by supporting the widespread adoption of electric buses for transit fleets and reducing vehicle miles traveled by encouraging people to choose clean, efficient, public transit options instead of personal motor vehicle travel;

Instead of reducing the impacts of retail deliveries by limiting retail delivery activity through regulation, it is more appropriate to continue to allow persons who receive retail deliveries to benefit from the convenience afforded by unfettered retail deliveries and instead impose a small fee on each retail delivery and use fee revenue to fund necessary mitigation activities;

It is necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of the state and all Coloradans to incentivize, support, and accelerate the electrification of public transit in rural and urban areas throughout the state because electrification:

Reduces emissions of air pollutants, including hazardous air pollutants and greenhouse gases, that contribute to adverse environmental effects, including but not limited to climate change, and adverse human health effects in and between communities, including communities near high-use transit corridors and disproportionately impacted communities, and helps the state meet its statutory greenhouse gas pollution reduction targets and comply with air quality attainment standards; and

By reducing fuel and maintenance costs associated with the use of motor vehicles, helps public transit providers operate more efficiently, use cost savings to provide more reliable and convenient transit service to more riders, and further reduce emissions by reducing personal motor vehicle use; and

By reducing motor vehicle emissions, transit fleet electrification effectively remediates some of the impacts of retail deliveries by offsetting a portion of the increased motor vehicle emissions resulting from such deliveries.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

In order to incentivize, support, and accelerate the electrification of public transit and thereby reap the environmental, health, business, and operational efficiency benefits of electrification, it is necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of the state to create a clean transit enterprise that can provide specialized remediation and other services that help public transit providers fund both the construction of the charging infrastructure needed to support electrification and the acquisition of electric motor vehicles;

The specific focus of the enterprise is the equitable reduction and mitigation of the adverse environmental and health impacts of air pollution and greenhouse gas emissions through incentivization, support, and acceleration of the electrification of public transit in rural and urban areas throughout the state;

The enterprise provides impact remediation services when, in exchange for the payment of clean transit retail delivery fees by purchasers of tangible personal property for retail delivery, it acts to mitigate the impacts of residential and commercial deliveries on the state's transportation infrastructure, air quality, and emissions by:

Making grants or loans or providing rebates to fund the acquisition of clean, quiet, and cost-efficient electric motor vehicles for use in transit fleets and the construction of charging infrastructure that supports the use of such electric motor vehicles for public transit and thereby:

Improving transportation options for fee payers and the general public, making transit more attractive to new or infrequent users, and reducing personal motor vehicle emissions; and

By making transit more attractive, reducing traffic congestion, which allows more timely and efficient retail deliveries, further reduces emissions of air pollutants and greenhouse gas pollutants from motor vehicles, and reduces and mitigates the adverse environmental and health impacts of such emissions;

Contributing in a unique and targeted way to the implementation of the comprehensive regulatory scheme required for the planning, funding, development, construction, maintenance, and supervision of a sustainable transportation system; and

Providing additional remediation services to offset impacts caused by fee payers as may be provided by law;

By providing remediation services as authorized by this section, the clean transit enterprise engages in an activity conducted in the pursuit of a benefit, gain, or livelihood and therefore operates as a business in accordance with the determination of the Colorado supreme court in Colorado Union of Taxpayers Foundation v. City of Aspen, 2018 CO 36;

Consistent with the determination of the Colorado supreme court in Nicholl v. E-470 Public Highway Authority, 896 P.2d 859 (Colo. 1995), that the power to impose taxes is inconsistent with enterprise status under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, it is the conclusion of the general assembly that the revenue collected by the enterprise is generated by fees, not taxes, because the clean transit retail delivery fee imposed by the enterprise as authorized by section 43-4-1203 (7) is:

Imposed for the specific purpose of allowing the enterprise to defray the costs of providing the remediation services specified in this section, including mitigating impacts to air quality and greenhouse gas emissions caused by the activities on which the fee is assessed, and contributes to the implementation of the comprehensive regulatory scheme required for the planning, funding, development, construction, maintenance, and supervision of a sustainable transportation system specified in this section; and

Collected at rates that are reasonably calculated based on the impacts caused by fee payers and the cost of remediating those impacts; and

So long as the enterprise qualifies as an enterprise for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, the revenue from the clean transit retail delivery fee collected by the enterprise is not state fiscal year spending, as defined in section 24-77-102 (17), or state revenues, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), and does not count against either the state fiscal year spending limit imposed by section 20 of article X of the state constitution or the excess state revenues cap, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(b)(I)(D).

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1451, § 52, effective June 17.

43-4-1202. Definitions.

As used in this part 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Battery electric motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is powered exclusively by a rechargeable battery pack that can be recharged by being plugged into an external source of electricity and that has no secondary source of propulsion.

"Board" means the governing board of the enterprise.

"Commission" means the transportation commission created in section 43-1-106 (1).

"Department" means the department of transportation created in section 24-1-128.7.

"Disproportionately impacted community" means a community that is in a census block group, as determined in accordance with the most recent United States decennial census, where the proportion of households that are low income is greater than forty percent, the proportion of households that identify as minority is greater than forty percent, or the proportion of households that are housing cost-burdened is greater than forty percent.

As used in this subsection (5):

"Cost-burdened" means a household that spends more than thirty percent of its income on housing.

"Low income" means the median household income is less than or equal to two hundred percent of the federal poverty guideline.

"Electric motor vehicle" means a battery electric motor vehicle, a hydrogen fuel cell motor vehicle, or a plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle.

"Electric motor vehicle charging infrastructure" means electric vehicle charging systems and other electrical equipment installed on site to support electric motor vehicle charging including but not limited to battery energy storage systems.

"Enterprise" means the clean transit enterprise created in section 43-4-1203 (1)(a).

"Fund" means the clean transit enterprise fund created in section 43-4-1203 (5).

"Hydrogen fuel cell motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is powered by electricity produced from a fuel cell that uses hydrogen gas as fuel.

"Inflation" means the average annual percentage change in the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the five years ending on the last December 31 before a state fiscal year for which an inflation adjustment to be made to the clean transit retail delivery fee imposed pursuant to section 43-4-1203 (7) begins.

"Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as set forth in section 42-1-102 (58). The term does not include a personal delivery device.

"Personal delivery device" means an autonomously operated robot that is:

Designed and manufactured for the purpose of transporting tangible personal property primarily on sidewalks, crosswalks, and other public rights-of-way that are typically used by pedestrians;

Weighs no more than five hundred fifty pounds, excluding any tangible personal property being transported; and

Operates at speeds of less than ten miles per hour when on sidewalks, crosswalks, and other public rights-of-way that are typically used by pedestrians.

"Plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is powered by both a rechargeable battery pack that can be recharged by being plugged into an external source of electricity and a secondary source of propulsion such as an internal combustion engine.

"Retail delivery" means a retail sale of tangible personal property by a retailer for delivery by a motor vehicle owned or operated by the retailer or any other person to the purchaser at a location in the state, which sale includes at least one item of tangible personal property that is subject to taxation under article 26 of title 39. Each such retail sale is a single retail delivery regardless of the number of shipments necessary to deliver the items of tangible personal property purchased.

"Retailer" has the same meaning as set forth in section 39-26-102 (8).

"Retail sale" has the same meaning as set forth in section 39-26-102 (9).

"Tangible personal property" has the same meaning as set forth in section 39-26-102 (15).

"Transit" means mass transit, as defined in section 43-1-102 (4).

"Zero emissions motor vehicle" means a battery electric motor vehicle or a hydrogen fuel cell motor vehicle.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1454, § 52, effective June 17.

43-4-1203. Clean transit enterprise - creation - board - powers and duties - rules - fees - fund.

The clean transit enterprise is created in the department. The enterprise is and operates as a government-owned business within the department in order to execute its business purpose as specified in subsection (3) of this section by exercising the powers and performing the duties and functions set forth in this section.

The enterprise is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department.

The governing board of the enterprise consists of nine members appointed as follows:

The governor shall appoint six members with the advice and consent of the senate for terms of the length specified in subsection (2)(b) of this section. The governor shall make reasonable efforts, to the extent such applications have been submitted for consideration for the board, to consider members that reflect the state's geographic diversity when making appointments and shall make initial appointments no later than October 1, 2021. Of the members appointed by the governor:

One member must be a member of the commission and have statewide transportation expertise;

One member must represent an urban area and have transit expertise;

One member must represent a rural area and have transit expertise;

One member must have expertise in zero-emissions transportation, motor vehicle fleets, or utilities;

One member must represent a transportation-focused organization that serves an environmental justice community; and

One member must represent a public advocacy group that has transit or comprehensive transportation expertise.

The executive director of the department of transportation or the executive director's designee;

The director of the Colorado energy office or the director's designee; and

The executive director of the department of public health and environment or the executive director's designee.

Members of the board appointed by the governor serve for terms of four years; except that three of the members initially appointed shall serve for initial terms of three years and the term of the member appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(I)(A) of this section continues for as long as the member is a member of the commission. A member who is appointed to fill a vacancy on the board shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term of the former member. The other board members serve for as long as they hold their positions or are designated to serve.

Members of the board serve without compensation but must be reimbursed from money in the fund for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties pursuant to this part 12.

The primary business purpose of the enterprise is to reduce and mitigate the adverse environmental and health impacts of air pollution and greenhouse gas emissions produced by motor vehicles used to make retail deliveries by supporting the replacement of existing gasoline and diesel transit vehicles with electric motor vehicles, including motor vehicles that originally were powered exclusively by internal combustion engines but have been converted into electric motor vehicles, providing the associated charging infrastructure for electric transit fleet motor vehicles, supporting facility modifications that allow for the safe operation and maintenance of electric transit motor vehicles, and funding planning studies that enable transit agencies to plan for transit vehicle electrification. To allow the enterprise to accomplish this business purpose and fully exercise its powers and duties through the board, the enterprise may:

Impose a clean transit retail delivery fee as authorized by subsection (7) of this section;

Issue grants and provide loans and rebates as authorized by subsection (8) of this section; and

Issue revenue bonds payable from the revenue and other available money of the enterprise.

The enterprise constitutes an enterprise for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution so long as it retains the authority to issue revenue bonds and receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenue in grants from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as it constitutes an enterprise pursuant to this subsection (4), the enterprise is not subject to section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The clean transit enterprise fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of clean transit retail delivery fee revenue credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, any monetary gifts, grants, donations, or other money received by the enterprise, any federal money that may be credited to the fund, and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the enterprise may expend money from the fund to provide grants, pay its reasonable and necessary operating expenses, including repayment of any loan received by the enterprise pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section, and otherwise exercise its powers and perform its duties as authorized by this part 3.

The commission may transfer money from the state highway fund created in section 43-1-219 to the enterprise for the purpose of defraying expenses incurred by the enterprise before it receives fee revenue or revenue bond proceeds, and a transfer for such purpose is made, in accordance with section 18 of article X of the state constitution, for the supervision of the public highways of this state. The enterprise may accept and expend any money so transferred, and, notwithstanding any state fiscal rule or generally accepted accounting principle that could otherwise be interpreted to require a contrary conclusion, such a transfer is a loan from the commission to the enterprise that is required to be repaid and is not a grant for purposes of section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution or as defined in section 24-77-102 (7). All money transferred as a loan to the enterprise shall be credited to the clean transit enterprise initial expenses fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury, and loan liabilities that are recorded in the fund but that are not required to be paid in the current fiscal year shall not be considered when calculating sufficient statutory fund balance for purposes of section 24-75-109. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the clean transit enterprise initial expenses fund to the fund. The clean transit enterprise initial expenses fund is continuously appropriated to the enterprise for the purpose of defraying expenses incurred by the enterprise before it receives fee revenue or revenue bond proceeds. As the enterprise receives sufficient revenue in excess of expenses, the enterprise shall reimburse the state highway fund for the principal amount of any loan made by the commission plus interest at a rate set by the commission.

In addition to any other powers and duties specified in this section, the board has the following general powers and duties:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

To acquire, hold title to, and dispose of real and personal property;

To employ and supervise individuals, professional consultants, and contractors as are necessary in its judgment to carry out its business purpose;

To contract with any public or private entity;

To seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, and donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this part 12. The enterprise shall transmit any money received through gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the fund.

To directly provide any service that it is authorized to provide indirectly through grants awarded pursuant to subsection (8) of this section;

To promulgate rules to set the amount of the clean transit retail delivery fee at or below the maximum amount authorized in this section and to govern the process by which the enterprise accepts applications for, awards, and oversees grants, loans, and rebates pursuant to subsection (8) of this section; and

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers and duties granted by this section.

In furtherance of its business purpose, beginning in state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose, and the department of revenue shall collect on behalf of the enterprise, a clean transit retail delivery fee on each retail delivery. Each retailer who makes a retail delivery shall add to the price of the retail delivery, collect from the purchaser, and pay to the department of revenue at the time and in the manner prescribed by the department in accordance with section 43-4-218 (6) the clean transit retail delivery fee. For the purpose of minimizing compliance costs for retailers and administrative costs for the state, the department of revenue shall collect and administer the clean transit retail delivery fee on behalf of the enterprise in the same manner in which it collects and administers the retail delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-218 (3).

For retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose the clean transit retail delivery fee in a maximum amount of three cents.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7)(c)(II) of this section, for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during state fiscal year 2023-24 or during any subsequent state fiscal year, the enterprise shall impose the clean transit retail delivery fee in a maximum amount that is the maximum amount for the prior state fiscal year adjusted for inflation. The enterprise shall notify the department of revenue of the amount of the clean transit retail delivery fee to be collected for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during each state fiscal year no later than March 15 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins, and the department of revenue shall publish the amount no later than April15 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins.

The enterprise is authorized to adjust the amount of the clean transit retail delivery fee for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during a state fiscal year only if the department of revenue adjusts the amount of the retail delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-218 (3) for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during the state fiscal year.

In furtherance of its business purpose, and subject to the requirements set forth in this subsection (8), the enterprise is authorized to make grants, loans, or rebates to support electrification of public transit.

The enterprise may make grants, loans, or rebates to fund:

Clean transit planning efforts;

Facility upgrades necessary for the safe operation and maintenance of electric motor vehicles used by public transit providers;

The construction of electric motor vehicle charging infrastructure used by public transit providers; and

The replacement of motor vehicles used by public transit providers that are not electric motor vehicles by electric motor vehicles, or, if electric motor vehicles are not practically available, by compressed natural gas motor vehicles, as defined in section 25-7.5-102 (5), if at least ninety percent of the fuel for the compressed natural gas motor vehicles will be recovered methane, as defined in section 25-7.5-102 (20).

The enterprise shall award grants on a competitive basis based on written criteria established by the enterprise in advance of any deadlines for the submission of grant applications.

The enterprise shall contract with the air pollution control division of the department of public health and environment to develop proposed rules for the consideration of the air quality control commission that will support the enterprise's business services, including remediation services, in a manner that maintains compliance with the federal and state statutes, rules, and regulations governing air quality. The division shall collaborate with the Colorado energy office and the department when developing the rules.

To ensure transparency and accountability, the enterprise shall:

No later than June 1, 2022, publish and post on its website a ten-year plan that details how the enterprise will execute its business purpose during state fiscal years 2022-23 through 2031-32 and estimates the amount of funding needed to implement the plan. No later than January 1, 2032, the enterprise shall publish and post on its website a new ten-year plan for state fiscal years 2032-33 through 2041-42.

Create, maintain, and regularly update on its website a public accountability dashboard that provides, at a minimum, accessible and transparent summary information regarding the implementation of its ten-year plan, the funding status and progress toward completion of each project that it wholly or partly funds, and its per project and total funding and expenditures;

Engage regularly regarding its projects and activities with the public, specifically reaching out to and seeking input from communities, including but not limited to disproportionately impacted communities, and interest groups that are likely to be interested in the projects and activities; and

Prepare an annual report regarding its activities and funding and present the report to the transportation commission created in section 43-1-106 (1) and to the transportation and local government and energy and environment committees of the house of representatives and the transportation and energy committee of the senate, or any successor committees. The enterprise shall also post the annual report on its website. Notwithstanding the requirement in section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the requirement to submit the report required in this subsection (10)(a)(IV) to the specified legislative committees continues indefinitely.

The enterprise is subject to the open meetings provisions of the "Colorado Sunshine Act of 1972", contained in part 4 of article 6 of title 24, and the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

For purposes of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, and except as may otherwise be provided by federal law or regulation or state law, the records of the enterprise are public records, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), regardless of whether the enterprise receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenue in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), from all Colorado state and local governments combined.

The enterprise is a public entity for purposes of part 2 of article 57 of title 11.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1456, § 52, effective June 17.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3433, § 225, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.